ja: テナーリコーダージョイントタイプ: コルクジョイント; Oリングジョイント; 糸巻きジョイント; その他
zh-CN: 次中音竖笛接口类型: 软木接口; O 型圈接口; 绕线接口; 其他
fi: Tenorinokkahuilun osarakenne: Korkkiliitos; O-rengasliitos; Lankakierretty liitos; Muu
pl: Typ łączenia fletu prostego tenorowego: Złącze korkowe; Złącze z o-ringiem; Złącze owijane nicią; Inne
ro-RO: Tip de îmbinare pentru fluier tenor: Îmbinare din plută; Îmbinare cu inel O; Îmbinare înfășurată cu ață; Altele
nl: Tenorblokfluit verbindingstype: Kurkverbinding; O-ringverbinding; Met draad omwikkelde verbinding; Overig
bg-BG: Тип сглобка на тенор блокфлейта: Коркова сглобка; Сглобка с О-пръстен; Сглобка, увита с конец; Друго
hu: Tenor rekorder illesztési típusa: Parafa illesztésű; O-gyűrűs illesztésű; Cérnával tekert illesztésű; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de juntas da flauta doce tenor: Junta de cortiça; Junta em O-ring; Junta envolvida em linha; Outro
sk-SK: Typ kĺbu tenorovej zobcovej flauty: Korkový spoj; Spoj s O-krúžkom; Spoj obmotaný niťou; Iné
es: Tipo de junta de flauta dulce tenor: Junta de corcho; Junta tórica; Junta envuelta en hilo; Otra
hr-HR: Vrsta zgloba za tenor blok flautu: Spoj s plutom; Spoj s O-prstenom; Spoj omotan navojem; Ostalo
pt-BR: Flauta doce tenor tipo de junção: Junta de cortiça; Junta com anel de vedação (O-ring); Junta envolvida por fio; Outra
fr: Type d’assemblage de la flûte à bec ténor: Joint en liège; Joint torique; Joint enveloppé de fil; Autre
zh-TW: 次中音直笛接管類型: 軟木接管; O 型環接管; 綁線接管; 其他
de: Verbindungsart der Tenorblockflöte: Korkverbindung; O-Ring-Verbindung; Gewickelte Verbindung (Fadenwicklung); Sonstige
da: Samlingstype for tenorblokfløjte: Korksamling; O-ringssamling; Trådviklet samling; Andet
th: ข้อต่อรีคอร์เดอร์เทเนอร์: ข้อต่อไม้ก๊อก; ข้อต่อโอริง; ข้อต่อพันด้าย; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại khớp nối sáo tenor: Khớp nối bần; Khớp nối vòng chữ O; Khớp nối bọc chỉ; Khác
cs: Typ spojení dílů tenorové zobcové flétny: Korkový spoj; O-kroužkový spoj; Spoj omotaný nití; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta spoja tenorske kljunaste flavte: Plutovinasti spoj; Spoj z O-obročkom; Spoj, ovit z nitjo; Drugo
ru: Тип соединения тенорной блокфлейты: Пробковое соединение; Соединение с уплотнительным кольцом; Соединение, обмотанное нитью; Другое
ko: 테너 리코더 연결부 유형: 코르크 조인트; O-링 조인트; 스레드 랩 조인트; 기타
lt-LT: Tenorinio blokflauto jungties tipas: Kamštinė jungtis; O-žiedo jungtis; Siūlais apvyniota jungtis; Kita
en: Tenor recorder joint type: Cork joint; O-ring joint; Thread-wrapped joint; Other
sv: Kopplingstyp för tenorblockflöjt: Korkfog; O-ringsfog; Gänglindad fog; Annat
tr: Tenor blok flüt bağlantı tipi: Mantar bağlantı; O-ring bağlantı; İplik sarılı bağlantı; Diğer
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης φλάουτου τενόρου: Ένωση από φελλό; Ένωση δακτυλίου O; Ένωση με νήμα; Άλλο
nb: Tenorblokkfløyte-leddtype: Korkskjøt; O-ringskjøt; Trådviklet skjøt; Annet
it: Tipo di giunzione del flauto dolce tenore: Giunto in sughero; Giunto con O-ring; Giunto avvolto a filo; Altro